Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 9.11, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . j. Chapter 524, including as provided in section 524.303. Senate File 166, p. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 524.2002 Secretary of state ââ extra services ââ surcharge. Upon the request of a filer of a document under this chapter, the secretary of state shall provide an extra filing service and assess a surcharge as provided in chapter 9, subchapter II. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 166, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor